District of Columbia statutes.
2-1223.23

Relation to other laws

Repealed.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 123, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689

Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-16 added subsec. (a)(2A) to read as follows:

“(2A) The Corporation and its subsidiaries shall be subject to, and comply with, the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 25, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-531 et seq.), and the District of Columbia Public Records Management Act of 1985, effective September 5, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-19; D.C. Official Code § 2-1701 et seq.).”

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 17-16 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 123 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Freedom of Information Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-29, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4077).